Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 4. Report by Holder

38-13-401.
Report required by holder.

A holder of property presumed abandoned and subject to the custody of the administrator shall report in a record to the administrator concerning the property. The administrator shall not require a holder to file a paper report.

A holder may contract with a third party to make the report required under subsection (1) of this section.

Whether or not a holder contracts with a third party under subsection (2) of this section, the holder is responsible:

To the administrator for the complete, accurate, and timely reporting of property presumed abandoned; and

For paying or delivering to the administrator property described in the report.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 426, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-402.
Content of report.

The report required under section 38-13-401 must:

Be signed by or on behalf of the holder and verified as to its completeness and accuracy;

If filed electronically, be in a secure format approved by the administrator that protects confidential information of the apparent owner in the same manner as required of the administrator and the administrator’s agent under part 14 of this article 13;

Describe the property;

Except for a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument, contain the name, if known; last-known address, if known; and social security number or taxpayer identification number, if known or readily ascertainable, of the apparent owner of property with a value of twenty-five dollars or more;

For an amount held or owing under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, contain the full name and last-known address of the insured, annuitant, or other apparent owner of the policy or contract and of the beneficiary;

For property held in or removed from a safe-deposit box, indicate the location of the property and where it may be inspected by the administrator;

Contain the commencement date for determining abandonment under part 2 of this article 13;

State that the holder has complied with the notice requirements of section 38-13-501;

Identify property that is a nonfreely transferable security, and explain why it is a nonfreely transferable security; and

Contain other information the administrator prescribes by rules necessary for the administrator.

A report under section 38-13-401 may include in the aggregate items valued under twenty-five dollars each. If the report includes items in the aggregate valued under twenty-five dollars each, the administrator shall not require the holder to provide the name and address of an apparent owner of an item unless the information is necessary to verify or process a claim in progress by the apparent owner.

A report under section 38-13-401 may include personal information as defined in section 38-13-1401 about the apparent owner or the apparent owner’s property to the extent not otherwise prohibited by federal law.

If a holder has changed its name while holding property presumed abandoned or is a successor to another person that previously held the property for the apparent owner, the holder shall include in the report under section 38-13-401 its former name or the name of the previous holder, if any, and the known name and address of each previous holder of the property.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 427, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-403.
When report to be filed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and subject to subsection (3) of this section, the report under section 38-13-401 must be filed before November 1 of each year and cover the twelve months preceding July 1 of that year.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the report to be filed by an insurance company under section 38-13-401 must be filed before May 1 of each year for the immediately preceding calendar year.

Before the date for filing the report under section 38-13-401, the holder of property presumed abandoned may request the administrator to extend the time for filing. The administrator may grant an extension. If the extension is granted, the holder may pay or make a partial payment of the amount the holder estimates ultimately will be due. The payment or partial payment terminates accrual of interest on the amount paid.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 428, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-404.
Retention of records by holder.

A holder required to file a report under section 38-13-401 shall retain records for ten years after the later of the date the report was filed or the last date a timely report was due to be filed, unless a shorter period is provided by rule of the administrator. A holder may satisfy the requirement to retain records under this section through an agent. The records must contain:

The information required to be included in the report;

The date, place, and nature of the circumstances that gave rise to the property right;

The amount or value of the property;

The last address of the apparent owner, if known to the holder; and

If the holder sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this state traveler’s checks, money orders, or similar instruments, other than third-party bank checks, on which the holder is directly liable, a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding indicating the state and date of issue.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 428, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-405.
When property reportable and payable or deliverable.

Property is reportable and payable or deliverable under this article 13 even if the owner fails to make demand or present an instrument or document otherwise required to obtain payment.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 429, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.